Idaho, session 2025, H0417.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the State Board of Education for Community
Colleges the following amounts to be expended according to the designated
programs for personnel costs from the General Fund for the period July 1,
2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR:
COLLEGE OF EASTERN IDAHO: $496,800
COLLEGE OF SOUTHERN IDAHO: $690,000
COLLEGE OF WESTERN IDAHO: $493,000
TOTAL $1,679,800
SECTION 2. TRANSITIONING TO OUTCOMES-BASED FUNDING IN HIGHER EDU-
CATION. The Office of the State Board of Education shall develop an out-
comes-based funding model to replace the Enrollment Workload Adjustment for
Idaho's community colleges. The Office of the State Board shall deliver a
written proposal to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee by December
31, 2025, with a plan for implementation of the new funding model in fis-
cal year 2028 or earlier. The Office of the State Board of Education shall
provide written reports to the Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee on
a quarterly basis detailing progress towards the outcomes-based funding
model. The format and content of this report will be determined in con-
sultation with the Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative
Services Office.
SECTION 3. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.